Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.505.120

Withholding state funds upon district noncompliance—Notice of.

If a local school district fails to comply with any binding restrictions issued by the superintendent of public instruction, the allocation of state funds for support of the local school district may be withheld, pending an investigation of the reason for such noncompliance by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Written notice of the intent to withhold state funds, with reasons stated for this action, shall be made to the school district by the office of the superintendent of public instruction before any portion of the state allocation is withheld.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 12. Formerly RCW 28A.65.455.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118: See note following RCW 28A.505.010.